Louisiana, session 2026, SB4.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:5.11(B)(1) and (3), the introductory paragraph of 5.11(B)(4), and
5.11(G) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§5.11. Water fluoridation program
* * *
B.(1) Each public water system that has at least five thousand service
connections and natural levels of fluoride that are outside the optimal range
established in the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this Section shall acquire,
install, operate, and maintain appropriate equipment and material in order to
maintain the level of fluoride in its water system in the optimal range for the purpose
of protecting the dental health of citizens of this state, as established in the rules and
regulations adopted pursuant to this Section.
* * *
(3) No public water system shall be required to comply with Paragraph (1)
of this Subsection unless sufficient funds have been identified by the state, whether
by appropriation, capital outlay, grants, or similar means or source of funds, as
available to that system for the cost of acquiring and installing fluoridation
equipment and the cost of material required to fluoridate said system for at least six
months from the date of initial installation.
(4) A public water system that has never used fluoridation to adjust fluoride
levels in its water and whose water contains fluoride in amounts outside the range
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 4 ENROLLED
established in the rules and regulations adopted pursuant to this Section as optimal
for the purpose of protecting the dental health of the citizenry shall be exempt from
compliance with Paragraph (1) of this Subsection provided all of the following
apply:
* * *
G. The office of public health, through the department Louisiana
Department of Health, shall promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act relating to the fluoridation of public water
systems, including but not limited to maintaining levels of fluoride in public water
systems within the optimal range for the purpose of protecting the oral health of the
citizens of this state.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.